Wisconsin, session 2025, AB164.
do enact as follows:AB164,11Section 1. 15.223 (2) of the statutes is created to read:AB164,2,3215.223 (2) Division of reemployment assistance. There is created in the 3department of workforce development a division of reemployment assistance.AB164,24Section 2. 40.02 (22) (b) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:AB164,2,6540.02 (22) (b) 3. Unemployment insurance or reemployment assistance 6benefits.AB164,37Section 3. 40.65 (5) (b) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB164,2,9840.65 (5) (b) 2. Any unemployment insurance or reemployment assistance 9benefit payable to the participant because of his or her work record.AB164,410Section 4. 49.147 (3) (ac) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB164,3,2149.147 (3) (ac) 2. State and federal unemployment reemployment assistance 2contributions or federal unemployment taxes.AB164,53Section 5. 49.163 (3) (a) 3. c. of the statutes is amended to read:AB164,3,5449.163 (3) (a) 3. c. State reemployment assistance contributions and federal 5unemployment insurance contributions or taxes, if any.AB164,66Section 6. 71.67 (7) (title) of the statutes is amended to read:AB164,3,8771.67 (7) (title) Withholding from unemployment compensation 8insurance reemployment assistance.AB164,79Section 7. 105.01 (1) (b) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB164,3,1510105.01 (1) (b) 1. The person employing the individuals in addition to wages or 11salaries pays federal social security taxes, state reemployment assistance 12contributions, and federal unemployment contributions or taxes, carries worker’s 13compensation insurance as required by state law, and maintains liability insurance 14covering the acts of its employees while rendering services to, for or under the 15direction of a 3rd person; andAB164,816Section 8. 105.115 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB164,4,217105.115 (2) (b) A statement of the employment status of the home care worker, 18specifically, whether the home care worker is an employee of the home care 19placement agency or of the home care consumer or is an independent contractor 20and a statement identifying which party is responsible for paying the wages or 21salary of the home care worker, paying federal social security taxes and state 22reemployment assistance contributions and federal unemployment contributions or 1taxes with respect to the home care worker, and procuring worker’s compensation or 2liability insurance covering injury to the home care worker.AB164,93Section 9. 105.115 (2) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB164,4,124105.115 (2) (c) A statement that, notwithstanding the employment status of 5the home care worker specified in the notice, the home care consumer may be 6determined to be the employer of the home care worker for purposes of certain state 7and federal labor laws and that, if that is the case, the home care consumer may be 8held responsible for paying the wages or salary of the home care worker, paying 9federal social security taxes and state reemployment assistance contributions and 10federal unemployment contributions or taxes with respect to the home care worker, 11procuring worker’s compensation or liability insurance covering injury to the home 12care worker, and complying with various other state and federal labor laws.AB164,1013Section 10. 105.115 (3) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB164,4,1814105.115 (3) (a) 1. A statement identifying which party is responsible for 15paying the wages or salary of the home care worker, paying federal social security 16taxes and state reemployment assistance contributions and federal unemployment 17contributions or taxes with respect to the home care worker, and procuring worker’s 18compensation or liability insurance covering injury to the home care worker.AB164,1119Section 11. 105.115 (4) (b) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB164,5,720105.115 (4) (b) 1. If the department finds that a home care placement agency 21has failed to provide a home care consumer with the notice required under sub. (2) 22and that the home care consumer is liable for the payment of federal social security 23taxes or state reemployment assistance contributions or federal unemployment 1contributions or taxes with respect to the home care worker, for the provision of 2worker’s compensation or liability insurance covering injury to the home care 3worker, for the payment of any fine or penalty imposed on the home care consumer 4for noncompliance with any state or federal labor law with respect to the home care 5worker, or for any injury to the home care worker, the department may recover from 6the home care placement agency, on behalf of the home care consumer, an amount 7equal to the total cost of those liabilities.AB164,128Section 12. 105.115 (4) (b) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:AB164,5,219105.115 (4) (b) 3. In the case of a home care consumer who commences an 10action in circuit court under par. (a), if the circuit court finds that the home care 11placement agency has failed to provide the home care consumer with the notice 12required under sub. (2) and that the home care consumer is liable for the payment 13of federal social security taxes or state reemployment assistance contributions or 14federal unemployment contributions or taxes with respect to the home care worker, 15for the provision of worker’s compensation or liability insurance covering injury to 16the home care worker, for the payment of any fine or penalty imposed on the home 17care consumer for noncompliance with any state or federal labor law with respect to 18the home care worker, or for any injury to the home care worker, the court may order 19the home care placement agency to pay to the home care consumer an amount equal 20to the total cost of those liabilities, together with costs under ch. 814 and, 21notwithstanding s. 814.04 (1), reasonable attorney fees.AB164,1322Section 13. 106.38 (3) (c) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:AB164,6,21106.38 (3) (c) 3. State reemployment assistance contributions and federal 2unemployment insurance contributions or taxes, if any.AB164,143Section 14. Chapter 108 (title) of the statutes is repealed and recreated to 4read:AB164,6,65CHAPTER 1086REEMPLOYMENT ASSISTANCEAB164,157Section 15. 108.01 (2m) of the statutes is created to read:AB164,6,128108.01 (2m) The federal Social Security Act requires that, in order for an 9individual to be eligible for reemployment assistance benefits, the individual must 10be able to work, available to work, and actively seeking work. The reemployment 11assistance program in Wisconsin should enact and focus on policies that 12complement individuals’ efforts to find employment.AB164,1613Section 16. 108.013 of the statutes is created to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab164 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab164 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB164 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB164 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB164: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting